Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2262.05
Intensive supervision probation programs; Supreme Court; duties.

The Supreme Court shall establish and enforce the standards and criteria for the administration of the intensive supervision probation programs.

Laws 1990, LB 220, § 3.